Utah statutes.
10-8-52.   Buildings -- Fire limits -- Removal and destruction of buildings violating ordinance.

They may define fire limits and prescribe limits within which no building shall be constructed except of brick, stone or other incombustible material, without permission, and may cause the destruction or removal of any building constructed or repaired in violation of any ordinance, and cause all buildings and enclosures which may be in a dangerous state to be put in a safe condition or removed.



No Change Since 1953

